Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-710
City council action; rights of adjoining property owner.

In cases of appeal from an action of the city council condemning real property as a nuisance or as dangerous under the police powers of the city, the owners of adjoining property may intervene in the action at any time before trial.

Laws 1985, LB 532, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 66.